Utah statutes.
63G-6-814.   Right to appeal to Court of Appeals.

Any person receiving an adverse decision or the state may appeal a decision of the Procurement Appeals Board to the Court of Appeals.  However, no appeal may be made by the state unless recommended by the chief procurement officer or the head of the purchasing agency involved, and approved by the attorney general.

